Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1305
Certificate of assessment; contents; effect.

The county assessor, when requested by any person, shall give a certificate of assessment of real property showing the amount, kind, location, and taxable value of property assessed, and such certificate shall be evidence of the legal assessment of such property for the year.

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 66.